District of Columbia statutes.
29-809.07

Action on plan of domestication by domesticating limited liability company.

(a)

A plan of domestication shall be consented to:

(1)

By all the members if the domesticating company is a limited liability company; and

(2)

As provided in the domesticating company’s governing statute, if the company is a foreign limited liability company.

(b)

Subject to any contractual rights, after a domestication is approved, and at any time before articles of domestication are delivered to the Mayor for filing under § 29-809.08, a domesticating limited liability company may amend the plan or abandon the domestication:

(1)

As provided in the plan; or

(2)

Except as otherwise prohibited in the plan, by the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-809.06.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1011 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).